el: Βάση αρωματοποιίας μεταφορέας τύπου: Αλκοόλ (αιθανόλη); DPG (διπροπυλενογλυκόλη); FCO (κλασματοποιημένο έλαιο καρύδας); Γλυκερίνη; IPM (μυριστικός ισοπροπυλεστέρας); Έλαιο χοχόμπα; Έλαιο (έλαιο βάσης); Αλκοόλ αρωματοποιίας (SDA/μετουσιωμένο αλκοόλ); Με βάση τη σιλικόνη; Με βάση το νερό; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta prijenosnika parfemske baze: Alkohol (etanol); DPG (dipropilenglikol); FCO (frakcionirano kokosovo ulje); Glicerin; IPM (izopropil miristat); Ulje jojobe; Ulje (bazno ulje); Parfemski alkohol (SDA / denaturirani alkohol); Na bazi silikona; Na bazi vode; Ostalo
ko: 향수 베이스 캐리어 유형: 알코올(에탄올); DPG(디프로필렌 글리콜); FCO(프랙셔네이티드 코코넛 오일); 글리세린; IPM(이소프로필 미리스테이트); 호호바 오일; 오일(캐리어 오일); 퍼퓨머스 알코올(SDA/변성 알코올); 실리콘 베이스; 수성 베이스; 기타
it: Tipo di solvente della base di profumeria: Alcol (etanolo); DPG (glicole dipropilenico); FCO (olio di cocco frazionato); Glicerina; IPM (miristato di isopropile); Olio di jojoba; Olio (olio vettore); Alcol per profumieri (SDA/alcol denaturato); A base di silicone; A base d'acqua; Altro
zh-CN: 香水基料载体类型: 酒精（乙醇）; DPG（二丙二醇）; FCO（分馏椰子油）; 甘油; IPM（肉豆蔻酸异丙酯）; 荷荷巴油; 油（基础油）; 香水酒精（SDA/变性酒精）; 硅基; 水基; 其他
en: Perfumery base carrier type: Alcohol (ethanol); DPG (dipropylene glycol); FCO (fractionated coconut oil); Glycerin; IPM (isopropyl myristate); Jojoba oil; Oil (carrier oil); Perfumers alcohol (SDA/denatured alcohol); Silicone-based; Water-based; Other
pt-PT: Base de perfumaria tipo transportador: Álcool (etanol); DPG (dipropilenoglicol); Óleo de coco fracionado (FCO); Glicerina; Miristato de isopropilo (IPM); Óleo de jojoba; Óleo (óleo transportador); Álcool para perfumaria (álcool desnaturado/SDA); À base de silicone; À base de água; Outro
sv: Bärartyp för parfymbas: Alkohol (etanol); DPG (dipropylenglykol); FCO (fraktionerad kokosolja); Glycerin; IPM (isopropylmyristat); Jojobaolja; Olja (bärarolja); Parfymalkohol (SDA/denaturerad alkohol); Silikonbaserad; Vattenbaserad; Övrigt
vi: Loại chất mang nền nước hoa: Cồn (ethanol); DPG (dipropylene glycol); FCO (dầu dừa phân đoạn); Glycerin; IPM (isopropyl myristate); Dầu jojoba; Dầu (dầu nền); Cồn nước hoa (SDA/cồn biến tính); Gốc silicone; Gốc nước; Khác
th: ฐานน้ำหอม ผู้ขนส่งประเภทขนส่ง: แอลกอฮอล์ (เอทานอล); DPG (ไดโพรพิลีนไกลคอล); FCO (น้ำมันมะพร้าวสกัดแยกส่วน); กลีเซอรีน; IPM (ไอโซโพรพิลไมริสเตต); น้ำมันโจโจ้บา; น้ำมัน (น้ำมันตัวพา); แอลกอฮอล์ทำน้ำหอม (SDA/แอลกอฮอล์แปลงสภาพ); สูตรซิลิโคน; สูตรน้ำ; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de base portadora en perfumería: Alcohol (etanol); DPG (dipropilenglicol); FCO (aceite de coco fraccionado); Glicerina; IPM (miristato de isopropilo); Aceite de jojoba; Aceite (aceite portador); Alcohol de perfumista (SDA/alcohol desnaturalizado); A base de silicona; A base de agua; Otro
pt-BR: Especifica como o cortador pingente deve ser carregado ou usado.: Álcool (etanol); DPG (dipropilenoglicol); Óleo de coco fracionado; Glicerina; IPM (miristato de isopropila); Óleo de jojoba; Óleo (óleo carreador); Álcool para perfumaria (álcool desnaturado); À base de silicone; À base de água; Outro
hu: Parfümalap hordozótípusa: Alkohol (etanol); DPG (dipropilénglikol); FCO (frakcionált kókuszolaj); Glicerin; IPM (izopropil-mirisztát); Jojobaolaj; Olaj (hordozóolaj); Parfümalkohol (SDA / denaturált szesz); Szilikonalapú; Vízalapú; Egyéb
pl: Typ nośnika bazy perfumeryjnej: Alkohol (etanol); DPG (glikol dipropylenowy); FCO (frakcjonowany olej kokosowy); Gliceryna; IPM (mirystynian izopropylu); Olej jojoba; Olej (olej bazowy); Alkohol perfumiarski (SDA / alkohol denaturowany); Na bazie silikonu; Na bazie wody; Inne
tr: Parfüm baz taşıyıcı/çözücü türü: Alkol (etanol); DPG (dipropilen glikol); FCO (fraksiyonlanmış hindistan cevizi yağı); Gliserin; IPM (izopropil miristat); Jojoba yağı; Yağ (taşıyıcı yağ); Parfümeri alkolü (SDA/denatüre alkol); Silikon bazlı; Su bazlı; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de purtător (carrier) utilizat în baza de parfumerie: Alcool (etanol); DPG (dipropilenglicol); FCO (ulei de cocos fracționat); Glicerină; IPM (miristat de izopropil); Ulei de jojoba; Ulei (ulei purtător); Alcool pentru parfumier (SDA/alcool denaturat); Pe bază de silicon; Pe bază de apă; Altele
nl: Parfumerie basisdragertype: Alcohol (ethanol); DPG (dipropyleenglycol); FCO (gefractioneerde kokosolie); Glycerine; IPM (isopropylmyristaat); Jojoba-olie; Olie (draagolie); Parfumeursalcohol (SDA/gedenatureerde alcohol); Op basis van siliconen; Op waterbasis; Overig
sk-SK: Typ nosnej zložky v parfumérii: Alkohol (etanol); DPG (dipropylénglykol); FCO (frakcionovaný kokosový olej); Glycerín; IPM (izopropylmyristát); Jojobový olej; Olej (nosný olej); Parfumérsky alkohol (SDA/denaturovaný alkohol); Na báze silikónu; Na báze vody; Iné
fr: Type de support de la base de parfumerie: Alcool (éthanol); DPG (dipropylène glycol); FCO (huile de noix de coco fractionnée); Glycérine; IPM (myristate d’isopropyle); Huile de jojoba; Huile (huile de support); Alcool de parfumeur (SDA/alcool dénaturé); À base de silicone; À base d’eau; Autre
fi: Hajusteen kantaja-aineen tyyppi: Alkoholi (etanoli); DPG (dipropyleeniglykoli); FCO (fraktioitu kookosöljy); Glyseriini; IPM (isopropyylimyristaatti); Jojobaöljy; Öljy (kantajaöljy); Hajuvesialkoholi (SDA/denaturoitu alkoholi); Silikonipohjainen; Vesipohjainen; Muu
zh-TW: 香水基底載體類型: 酒精 (乙醇); DPG (二丙二醇); FCO (分餾椰子油); 甘油; IPM (肉豆蔻酸異丙酯); 荷荷芭油; 油 (基底油); 調香師酒精 (SDA/變性酒精); 矽靈基底; 水性基底; 其他
nb: Beholdertype for parfymebase: Alkohol (etanol); DPG (dipropylenglykol); FCO (fraksjonert kokosolje); Glyserin; IPM (isopropylmyristat); Jojobaolje; Olje (bæreolje); Parfymealkohol (SDA / denaturert alkohol); Silikonbasert; Vannbasert; Annet
de: Trägerstofftyp der Parfümbasis: Alkohol (Ethanol); DPG (Dipropylenglykol); FCO (fraktioniertes Kokosöl); Glycerin; IPM (Isopropylmyristat); Jojobaöl; Öl (Trägeröl); Parfümalkohol (SDA/denaturierter Alkohol); Silikonbasiert; Wasserbasiert; Sonstige
lt-LT: Parfumerijos bazės nešiklio tipas: Alkoholis (etanolis); DPG (dipropilenglikolis); FCO (frakcionuotas kokosų aliejus); Glicerinas; IPM (izopropilo miristatas); Simondsijų aliejus; Aliejus (bazinis aliejus); Parfumerinis alkoholis (SDA / denatūruotas alkoholis); Silikono pagrindu; Vandens pagrindu; Kita
da: Type basalt parfumebærestof: Alkohol (ethanol); DPG (dipropylenglykol); FCO (fraktioneret kokosolie); Glycerin; IPM (isopropylmyristat); Jojobaolie; Olie (bæreolie); Parfumealkohol (SDA/denatureret sprit); Silikonebaseret; Vandbaseret; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta nosilca parfumskega osnove: Alkohol (etanol); DPG (dipropilenglikol); FCO (frakcionirano kokosovo olje); Glicerin; IPM (izopropil miristat); Jojobino olje; Olje (nosilno olje); Parfumski alkohol (SDA/denaturiran alkohol); Na osnovi silikona; Na vodni osnovi; Drugo
ru: Тип носителя парфюмерной базы: Спирт (этанол); ДПГ (дипропиленгликоль); ФКМ (фракционированное кокосовое масло); Глицерин; ИПМ (изопропилмиристат); Масло жожоба; Масло (базовое); Парфюмерный спирт (денатурированный); На силиконовой основе; На водной основе; Другое
bg-BG: Тип базов носител за парфюмерия: Алкохол (етанол); DPG (дипропилен гликол); FCO (фракционирано кокосово масло); Глицерин; IPM (изопропил миристат); Масло от жожоба; Масло (базово масло); Парфюмериен алкохол (SDA/денатуриран алкохол); На силиконова основа; На водна основа; Друг
cs: Typ nosiče parfémové báze: Alkohol (ethanol); DPG (dipropylenglykol); FCO (frakcionovaný kokosový olej); Glycerin; IPM (isopropylmyristát); Jojobový olej; Olej (nosný olej); Parfumérský alkohol (SDA/denaturovaný alkohol); Na bázi silikonu; Na vodní bázi; Ostatní
ja: 香水ベース配送業者タイプ: アルコール（エタノール）; DPG (ジプロピレングリコール); FCO (分留ココナッツオイル); グリセリン; IPM (ミリスチン酸イソプロピル); ホホバオイル; オイル（キャリアオイル）; 香水用アルコール（SDA/変性アルコール）; シリコンベース; 水性; その他